Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.040

Travel expenses of members—Reimbursement.

The members of the committee shall serve without additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the committee or meetings of any subcommittee of the committee, or on other committee business authorized by the committee.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 4.]